Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2201
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-2201 to 81-2227 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 28.